Maryland, session 2026, SB0718.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
20–102.
This title applies only in Frederick County.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0718*

SENATE BILL 718
20–409.
(A) THERE IS A CLASS L BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR PERMIT.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE PERMIT TO THE HOLDER OF A
MANUFACTURER’S LICENSE THAT ALSO HOLDS A CLASS DBR BREWERY LICENSE OR
A CLASS DDS DISTILLERY PERMIT.
(C) THE PERMIT AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER, FOR ON–PREMISES
CONSUMPTION, TO:
(1) SELL BY THE GLASS BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR PRODUCED BY THE
HOLDER OR ANOTHER HOLDER OF A MANUFACTURER’S LICENSE;
(2) SELL BY THE GLASS MIXED DRINKS FROM PRODUCTS
MANUFACTURED BY THE HOLDER OR ANOTHER HOLDER OF A MANUFACTURER’S
LICENSE; AND
(3) ALLOW FOR TASTING OF THE BEER, WINE, OR LIQUOR THAT IS
AUTHORIZED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION AT NO COST, IN A QUANTITY NOT
EXCEEDING:
(I) 6 TOTAL OUNCES OF BEER PER INDIVIDUAL PER VISIT;
(II) 6 TOTAL OUNCES OF WINE PER INDIVIDUAL PER VISIT;
(III) 1.5 TOTAL OUNCES OF LIQUOR PER INDIVIDUAL PER VISIT,
WHICH MAY BE MIXED WITH OTHER NONALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; AND
(IV) FOR A COMBINATION OF BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR, 6
OUNCES OF BEER AND WINE IN TOTAL AND 0.5 OUNCES OF LIQUOR.
(D) THE HOURS OF SALE OR TASTING FOR THE PERMIT ARE THE SAME AS
THOSE FOR THE UNDERLYING MANUFACTURER’S LICENSE.
(E) THE HOLDER MUST COMPLY WITH THE ALCOHOL AWARENESS TRAINING
REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 4–505 OF THIS ARTICLE, SUBJECT TO § 20–1903 OF THIS
TITLE.
(F) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
(G) THE ANNUAL PERMIT FEE IS $250.

SENATE BILL 718 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.